Alaska, session 34, HB115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 34.03.020 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (f) A landlord may not increase the rent for a dwelling unit more than once in 05 a calendar year. While rent is current, the landlord may not increase rent for the 06 dwelling unit unless the landlord gives written notice to the tenant at least 90 days 07 before the date of the increase specified in the notice. Upon termination, either by a 08 landlord or by the expiration of the term, of a rental agreement or month to month 09 tenancy for a dwelling unit of a tenant that is current on rent, 10 (1) if notice has been given to the tenant under this subsection, the rent 11 for the dwelling unit in a subsequent rental agreement or month to month tenancy may 12 not exceed the amount charged under the terminated or expired rental agreement or 13 month to month tenancy until after the date of the increase specified in the notice; or 14 (2) if notice has not been given to the tenant under this subsection, the 15 rent for the dwelling unit in a subsequent rental agreement or month to month tenancy 01 may not exceed the amount charged under the terminated or expired rental agreement 02 or month to month tenancy until 90 days after the date the rental agreement was 03 terminated or expired. 04 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 05 read: 06 APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to a rental agreement that is entered into on or 07 after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.